Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.080

Forgery—Description of instrument.

When an instrument which is the subject of an indictment or information for forgery has been destroyed or withheld by the act or procurement of the defendant, and the fact of the destruction or withholding is alleged in the indictment or information, and established on the trial, the misdescription of the instrument is immaterial.

[ 1891 c 28 s 35; Code 1881 s 1020; 1873 p 227 s 203; 1854 p 113 s 68; RRS s 2071.]

NOTES:

Forgery: Chapter 9A.60 RCW.